Hawaii statutes.
§431:3A-302
Limits on redisclosure and reuse of nonpublic personal financial information.
(a) If a licensee receives nonpublic personal financial information from a
nonaffiliated financial institution under an exception in section 431:3A-402 or
431:3A-403, the licensee's disclosure and use of that information shall be as
follows:

(1) The licensee may disclose the information to the
affiliates of the financial institution from which the licensee received the
information;

(2) The licensee may disclose the information to its
affiliates who may disclose and use the information only to the extent that the
licensee may disclose and use the information; and

(3) The licensee may disclose and use the information
pursuant to an exception under section 431:3A-402 or 431:3A-403, in the
ordinary course of business to carry out the activity covered by the exception
under which the licensee received the information.

(b) If a licensee receives nonpublic personal
financial information from a nonaffiliated financial institution other than
under an exception in section 431:3A-402 or 431:3A-403, the licensee may
disclose the information only:

(1) To the affiliates of the financial institution
from which the licensee received the information;

(2) To its affiliates who may disclose the
information only to the extent that the licensee may disclose the information;
and

(3) To any other person, if the disclosure would be
lawful if made directly to that person by the financial institution from which
the licensee received the information.

(c) If a licensee discloses nonpublic personal
financial information to a nonaffiliated third party under an exception in
section 431:3A-402 or 431:3A-403, the third party may disclose and use that
information, as follows:

(1) Disclose to the licensee's affiliates;

(2) Disclose to its affiliates, who may disclose and
use the information only to the extent that the third party may disclose and
use the information; and

(3) Disclose and use the information pursuant to an
exception under section 431:3A-402 or 431:3A-403 in the ordinary course of
business to carry out the activity covered by the exception under which it
received the information.

(d) If a licensee discloses nonpublic personal
financial information to a nonaffiliated third party other than under an
exception under section 431:3A-402 or 431:3A-403, the third party may disclose
the information only:

(1) To the licensee's affiliates;

(2) To the third party's affiliates who may disclose
the information only to the extent the third party can disclose the
information; and

(3) To any other person, if the disclosure would be
lawful if the licensee made it directly to that person. [L 2001, c 220, pt of
§1; am L 2003, c 212, §32]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next